Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB246.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2005-I. Diversity training or course prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--An institution of higher education may not require a student to complete any of the following in order to graduate, receive a degree or receive credit hours:(1) Diversity training.(2) A diversity course.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 1234567891011121314151617181920 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Diversity course." A program of study that is based on theories that systemic racism, sexism, oppression or privilege are inherent in the institutions of the United States and were created to maintain social, political or economic inequities. The term includes elements of a course that utilize diversity-focused pedagogy."Diversity training." Training that is based on theories that systemic racism, sexism, oppression or privilege are inherent in the institutions of the United States and were created to maintain social, political or economic inequities. The term includes elements of training that utilize diversity-focused pedagogy."Institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A.(2) A rural regional college established under Article XIX-G.(3) A university within the State System of Higher Education.(4) An institution that is designated as "State-related" by the Commonwealth.(5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0246PN0196 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223